Hawaii statutes.
§286-242 Commercial drivers prohibited from
operating with any alcohol in their body. (a) Notwithstanding any other
provision of this chapter, a person may not drive a commercial motor vehicle
while having any alcohol in that person's body.

(b) A person who drives a commercial motor
vehicle with an alcohol concentration of 0.01 or more grams of alcohol per two
hundred ten liters of breath or with 0.01 or more grams of alcohol per one
hundred milliliters or cubic centimeters of blood or who refuses to take a test
as provided by section 286-243 shall be issued a twenty-four-hour
out-of-service order. The driver shall also be placed out-of-service for
twenty-four hours if the results of a blood test are not immediately available.

(c) It is unlawful for any person with an
alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more grams of alcohol per two hundred ten
liters of breath or with 0.04 or more grams of alcohol per one hundred
milliliters or cubic centimeters of blood to drive a "commercial motor
vehicle", as defined in section 286-2. Any person who violates this
provision shall be subject to the penalties as provided in section 286-249. [L
1989, c 320, pt of §2; am L 1990, c 342, §11; am L 1995, c 114, §7; am L 2006,
c 130, §8; am L 2011, c 67, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next